Washington statutes.
RCW 7.25.030

Judgment as to validity of all or part of bond issue—Effect.

The court in such action shall enter its judgment determining whether or not the bonds as proposed will be valid, and if the court finds that a portion, but not all, of the said bond issue is authorized by law, the court shall so declare, and find by its judgment what portion of such bond issue will be valid, and the judgment in said action shall be conclusive and binding upon all interested parties and upon all other persons.

[ 1999 c 284 s 4; 1939 c 153 s 3; RRS s 5616-13. Formerly RCW 7.24.170.]